Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 1 General Provisions
7-1-103. Miscellaneous misdemeanor offenses — Penalties — Definitions.

(a)

The violation of any of the following shall be deemed misdemeanors punishable as provided in this section:

(1)

It shall be unlawful for any person to appoint or offer to appoint anyone to any office or position of trust or for any person to influence, attempt to influence, or offer to influence the appointment, nomination, or election of any person to office in consideration of the support or assistance of the person for any candidate in any election in this state;

(2)(A)(i)

It shall be unlawful for any public servant, as defined in §21-8-402, to devote any time or labor during usual office hours toward the campaign of any other candidate for office or for the nomination to any office.

(ii)

Devoting any time or labor during usual office hours toward the campaign of any other candidate for office or for the nomination to any office includes without limitation the gathering of signatures for a nominating petition.

(B)

It shall be unlawful for any public servant, as defined in §21-8-402, to circulate an initiative or referendum petition or to solicit signatures on an initiative or referendum petition in any public office of the state, county, or municipal governments of Arkansas or during the usual office hours or while on duty for any state agency or any county or municipal government in Arkansas.

(C)

It shall be unlawful for any public servant, as defined in §21-8-402, to coerce, by threats or otherwise, any public employee into devoting time or labor toward the campaign of any candidate for office or for the nomination to any office;

(3)(A)

It shall be unlawful for any public servant, as defined in §21-8-402, to use any office or room furnished at public expense to distribute any letters, circulars, or other campaign materials unless such office or room is regularly used by members of the public for such purposes without regard to political affiliation. It shall further be unlawful for any public servant to use for campaign purposes any item of personal property provided with public funds.

(B)

As used in subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section, “campaign materials” and “campaign purposes” refer to:

(i)

The campaign of a candidate for public office; and

(ii)

Efforts to support or oppose a ballot measure, except as provided in §7-1-111;

(4)

It shall be unlawful for any person to assess any public employee, as defined in §21-8-402, for any political purpose whatever or to coerce, by threats or otherwise, any public employee into making a subscription or contribution for any political purpose;

(5)

It shall be unlawful for any person employed in any capacity in any department of the State of Arkansas to have membership in any political party or organization that advocates the overthrow of our constitutional form of government;

(6)

It shall be unlawful for any campaign banners, campaign signs, or other campaign literature to be placed on any cars, trucks, tractors, or other vehicles belonging to the State of Arkansas or any municipality, county, or school district in the state;

(7)(A)(i)

All articles, statements, or communications appearing in any newspaper printed or circulated in this state intended or calculated to influence the vote of any elector in any election and for the publication of which a consideration is paid or to be paid shall clearly contain the words “Paid Political Advertisement”, “Paid Political Ad”, or “Paid for by” the candidate, committee, or person who paid for the message.

(ii)

Both the persons placing and the persons publishing the articles, statements, or communications shall be responsible for including the required disclaimer.

(B)(i)

All articles, statements, or communications appearing in any radio, television, or any other electronic medium intended or calculated to influence the vote of any elector in any election and for the publication of which a consideration is paid or to be paid shall clearly contain the words:

(a)

“Paid political advertisement” or “paid political ad”; or

(b)

“Paid for by”, “sponsored by”, or “furnished by” the true sponsor of the advertisement.

(ii)

Both the persons placing and the persons publishing the articles, statements, or communications shall be responsible for including the required disclaimer;

(8)(A)

An election official acting in his or her official capacity shall not do any electioneering:

(i)

On election day or any day on which early voting is allowed;

(ii)

In a building in which voting is taking place; or

(iii)

Within one hundred feet (100') of the primary exterior entrance used by voters to a building in which voting is taking place.

(B)

On early voting days and election day, a person shall not do any electioneering during voting hours:

(i)

In a building in which voting is taking place;

(ii)

Within one hundred feet (100') of the primary exterior entrance used by voters to a building in which voting is taking place; or

(iii)

With persons standing in line to vote.

(C)(i)

As used in this subdivision (a)(8), “electioneering” means the display of or audible dissemination of information that advocates for or against any candidate, issue, or measure on a ballot.

(ii)

“Electioneering” includes without limitation the following:

(a)

Handing out, distributing, or offering to hand out or distribute campaign literature or literature regarding a candidate, issue, or measure on the ballot;

(b)

Soliciting signatures on a petition;

(c)

Soliciting contributions for a charitable or other purpose;

(d)

Displaying a candidate's name, likeness, or logo;

(e)

Displaying a ballot measure's number, title, subject, or logo;

(f)

Displaying or dissemination of buttons, hats, pencils, pens, shirts, signs, or stickers containing electioneering information; and

(g)

Disseminating audible electioneering information.

(iii)

“Electioneering” does not include:

(a)

The presentation of a candidate's identification by the candidate under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13; or

(b)

The display of a ballot measure in the polling place as required under §7-5-202;

(9)

No election official shall perform any of the duties of the position before taking and subscribing to the oath provided for in §7-4-110;

(10)

No person applying for a ballot shall swear falsely to any oath administered by the election officials with reference to his or her qualifications to vote;

(11)

No person shall willfully cause or attempt to cause his or her own name to be registered in any other election precinct than that in which he or she is or will be before the next ensuing election qualified as an elector;

(12)

During any election, no person shall remove, tear down, or destroy any booths or supplies or other conveniences placed in any booth or polling site for the purpose of enabling the voter to prepare his or her ballot;

(13)

No person shall take or carry any ballot obtained from any election official outside of the polling room or have in his or her possession outside of the polling room before the closing of the polls any ballot provided by any county election commissioner;

(14)

No person shall furnish a ballot to any elector who cannot read informing him or her that it contains a name or names different from those that are written or printed thereon or shall change or mark the ballot of any elector who cannot read so as to prevent the elector from voting for any candidate, act, section, or constitutional amendment as the elector intended;

(15)

No election official or other person shall unfold a ballot or without the express consent of the voter ascertain or attempt to ascertain any vote on a ballot before it is placed in the ballot box;

(16)

No person shall print or cause to be printed any ballot for any election held under this act with the names of the candidates appearing thereon in any other or different order or manner than provided by this act;

(17)

No election official shall permit the vote of any person to be cast in any election precinct in this state in any election legally held in this state when the person does not appear in person at the election precinct and actually cast the vote. This subdivision (a)(17) shall not apply to persons entitled to cast absentee ballots;

(18)(A)

No person shall vote or offer to vote more than one (1) time in any election held in this state, either in person or by absentee ballot, or shall vote in more than one (1) election precinct in any election held in this state.

(B)

No person shall cast a ballot or vote in the preferential primary of one (1) political party and then cast a ballot or vote in the general primary of another political party in this state;

(19)

No person shall:

(A)

Vote, knowing himself or herself not to be entitled to vote;

(B)

Vote more than once at any election or knowingly cast more than one (1) ballot or attempt to do so;

(C)

Provide assistance to a voter in marking and casting the voter's ballot except as provided in §7-5-310;

(D)

Alter or attempt to alter any ballot after it has been cast;

(E)

Add or attempt to add any ballot to those legally polled at any election either by fraudulently introducing it into the ballot box before or after the ballots have been counted or at any other time or in any other manner with the intent or effect of affecting the count or recount of the ballots;

(F)

Withdraw or attempt to withdraw any ballot lawfully polled with the intent or effect of affecting the count or recount of the ballots; or

(G)

In any manner interfere with the officials lawfully conducting the election or the canvass or with the voters lawfully exercising their right to vote at the election;

(20)

No person shall make any bet or wager upon the result of any election in this state;

(21)

No election official, poll watcher, or any other person in or out of this state in any primary, general, or special election in this state shall divulge to any person the results of any votes cast for any candidate or on any issue in the election until after the closing of the polls on the day of the election. The provisions of this subdivision (a)(21) shall not apply to any township or precinct in this state in which all of the registered voters therein have voted prior to the closing of the polls in those instances in which there are fifteen (15) or fewer registered voters in the precinct or township; and

(22)

Any person, election official, county clerk, or deputy clerk who violates any provisions of the absentee voting laws, §7-5-401 et seq., shall be punished as provided in this section.

(b)(1)

Except as otherwise provided, the violation of any provision of this section shall be a Class A misdemeanor.

(2)(A)

Any person convicted under the provisions of this section shall thereafter be ineligible to hold any office or employment in any of the departments in this state.

(B)(i)

If any person is convicted under the provisions of this section while employed by any of the departments of this state, he or she shall be removed from employment immediately.

(ii)

If any person is convicted under the provisions of this section while holding public office, the conviction shall be deemed a misfeasance and malfeasance in office and shall subject the person to impeachment.

(c)

Any violation of this act not covered by this section and §7-1-104 shall be considered a Class A misdemeanor and shall be punishable as such.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 11, § 4; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 1; 1971, No. 261, § 24; 1981, No. 327, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1104; Acts 1987, No. 395, § 1; 1989, No. 505, § 2; 1991, No. 241, § 2; 1991, No. 786, § 4; 1995, No. 497, § 1; 1995, No. 1085, § 1; 1997, No. 445, § 2; 1997, No. 1121, § 1; 1999, No. 553, § 1; 1999, No. 1525, § 1; 2001, No. 795, § 1; 2001, No. 926, § 1; 2001, No. 1839, § 1; 2005, No. 1284, § 1; 2007, No. 221, § 1; 2009, No. 310, § 1; 2009, No. 473, § 1; 2009, No. 658, § 1; 2011, No. 721, § 1; 2013, No. 312, § 1; 2019, No. 533, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, the amendment of subdivision (a)(9) by Acts 1997, No. 445 is deemed to be superseded by its amendment by Acts 1997, No. 1121. Acts 1997, No. 445 amended (a)(9) to read as follows:

“(a)(9)

No person shall willfully disturb or engage in riotous conduct at or near any polling site with the intent or effect of disturbing or interfering with the access of the electors to the polling site.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added (a)(2)(C) and (a)(3)(B) and made related changes; inserted “or school district” in (a)(6); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 310 inserted (a)(7)(B) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; deleted “or on radio, television, or any other electronic medium” in (a)(7)(A)(i), and made a related change.

The 2009 amendment by No. 473 inserted (a)(2)(A)(ii).

The 2009 amendment by No. 658 inserted (a)(20)(C) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2011 amendment added “or ‘Paid for by’ the candidate, committee, or person who paid for the message” to the end of (a)(7)(A)(i).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a)(3)(B).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a)(8).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §7-1-101.

7-1-104. Miscellaneous felonies — Penalties.

(a)

The following offenses shall be deemed felonies punishable as provided in this section:

(1)

No person shall falsely make or fraudulently destroy any certificate of nominations or any part thereof, file any certificate of nominations knowing the certificate or any part thereof to be false, suppress any nomination or any part thereof which has been filed, or forge or falsely write the name or initials of any election official on any ballot;

(2)

No public official or other person shall in any manner willfully or corruptly permit any person not entitled to register for the purpose of voting to register, nor shall a public official or other person forge or attempt to forge a registration;

(3)

No person shall vote in any election in the state unless the person is a qualified elector of this state and has registered to vote in the manner provided by law;

(4)

It shall be unlawful for any person to offer, accept, receive, or pay any person any money, goods, wares, or merchandise or solicit any money, goods, wares, or merchandise for the purpose of influencing his or her vote during the progress of any election in this state;

(5)

It shall be unlawful for any person to make any threat or attempt to intimidate any elector or the family, business, or profession of the elector;

(6)

It shall be unlawful for any person to interfere with or to prevent any qualified elector from voting at any election or to attempt to interfere with or to prevent any qualified elector from voting at any election, provided that this subdivision (a)(6) shall not prohibit good faith challenges of ballots or voters according to law by candidates, authorized representatives of candidates, political parties, or ballot issues;

(7)

It shall be unlawful for any person to attend any polling site on election day and hand out or give away any campaign cards, placards, or other articles for the purpose of influencing the electors to vote for any candidate, except in the manner now provided by law;

(8)(A)

It shall be unlawful for a person with the intent to defraud a voter or an election official to possess an absentee ballot issued to another.

(B)

The possession by a person of more than ten (10) absentee ballots creates a rebuttable presumption of intent to defraud.

(C)

The presumption under subdivision (a)(8)(B) of this section does not apply to:

(i)

An employee of the United States Postal Service performing the normal course of the employee's authorized duties;

(ii)

A common or contract carrier performing the normal course of the carrier's authorized duties;

(iii)

The administrative head of a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state authorized by a voter under Arkansas law; or

(iv)

An election official acting in his or her official capacity;

(9)

No person shall tamper with a voting machine or fraudulently affect or attempt to affect its results;

(10)

No person may cast a ballot in more than one (1) party primary election on the same day in this state or for candidates for more than one (1) political party;

(11)

No person shall vote in any election more than one (1) vote;

(12)

No person shall vote or attempt to vote other than his or her legal ballot;

(13)

No election official shall knowingly permit any person to vote other than his or her legal ballot in any election;

(14)

No election official or other person shall fraudulently permit any person to vote illegally, refuse the vote of any qualified elector, or cast up or make a false return of any election;

(15)

No election official or other person shall willfully make a false count of any election ballots or falsely or fraudulently certify the returns of any election;

(16)

No person shall fraudulently change, alter, or obliterate the poll books or books of any election or break any seals upon any ballot box, voting machine, or stub box, except as authorized by law;

(17)

No person shall contrive, alter, forge, counterfeit, detain, mutilate, steal, secrete, or destroy any election returns or election materials for the purpose of hindering or preventing or falsely reporting a tabulation or check of the returns; and

(18)

Any person who violates the provisions of §7-5-702 or who shall disclose how any voter may have voted unless compelled to do so in a judicial proceeding shall be deemed guilty of a Class D felony and punished as provided in this section.

(b)(1)

Any person convicted of a felony as defined in this section shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

(2)(A)

Any person convicted of a felony as defined in this section shall be barred from holding public office or employment in any of the departments of the state from the date of his or her conviction.

(B)(i)

If the person is employed by any of the departments of this state at the time of his or her conviction, he or she shall be removed from employment immediately.

(ii)

If any person is convicted under the provisions of this section while holding public office, the conviction shall be deemed a misfeasance and malfeasance in office and shall subject the person to impeachment.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 11, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1105; Acts 1995, No. 497, § 1; 1995, No. 1085, § 1; 1997, No. 445, § 3; 1999, No. 655, § 1; 2001, No. 1553, § 17; 2003, No. 1458, § 1; 2005, No. 1677, § 1; 2009, No. 658, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (a)(8) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

7-1-105. Majority of qualified electors.

Whenever any law of this state shall require that a proposition or question shall be adopted by a majority of the qualified electors of this state, of a city, or of a county based on the total number of electors of the state, city, or county, appearing on the certified list of all qualified electors thereof, the majority required for the adoption of the proposition or question hereafter shall be deemed to be the majority of the qualified electors of the state, city, or county voting on the proposition or question at the election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1303; Acts 1997, No. 445, § 4.

7-1-106. Election laws expert.

The Secretary of State shall designate at least one (1) member of his or her staff to become knowledgeable of the election laws as they pertain to elections in the State of Arkansas for the purpose of answering procedural questions concerning elections and to aid the candidates and their agents in filing for election.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 312, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1314.

7-1-107. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concering independent candidates for municipal office, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 445, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 545, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-956.

7-1-108. Election law deadlines.

If an election law deadline occurs on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the deadline shall be the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 653, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical language appears at Ark. Const., Amend. 51, § 9(l) as amended by Acts 1999, No. 654, § 1, Acts 2003, No. 995, § 3, and Acts 2005, No. 1952, § 1.

7-1-109. Enforcement of election laws.

Following a written complaint concerning any election law violation or irregularity to the county board of election commissioners, the written complaint shall be sent by the county board of election commissioners to the appropriate county clerk and appropriate prosecuting attorney for evaluation.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 270, § 1.

7-1-110. Voting information on internet website.

The Secretary of State shall provide on his or her internet website a mechanism to allow a person to enter his or her home address and retrieve information concerning the person's polling location, precinct, state representative, and state senator.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1167, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

The Secretary of State's website address is www.sos.arkansas.gov.

7-1-111. Use of public funds to support or oppose ballot measure — Definitions.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Governmental body” means the same as defined in §21-8-402;

(2)

“Public funds” means funds, moneys, receivables, grants, investments, instruments, real or personal property, or other assets, liabilities, equities, revenues, receipts, or disbursements belonging to, held by, or passed through a governmental body; and

(3)(A)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(3)(B) of this section, “public servant” means an individual who is:

(i)

Employed by a governmental body;

(ii)

Appointed to serve a governmental body; or

(iii)

Appointed to a governmental body.

(B)

“Public servant” does not include:

(i)

An elected official; or

(ii)

A person appointed to an elective office.

(b)

It is unlawful for a public servant or a governmental body to expend or permit the expenditure of public funds to support or oppose a ballot measure.

(c)

This section does not:

(1)

Limit the freedom of speech of a public servant or government body, including without limitation verbal expressions of views supporting or opposing a ballot measure;

(2)

Prohibit a governmental body from expressing an opinion on a ballot measure through the passage of a resolution or proclamation;

(3)

Prohibit the incidental use of state resources by a public servant, including without limitation travel costs, when speaking at an event in which a ballot measure is discussed if the subject matter of the speaking engagement is within the scope of the official duties and responsibilities of the public servant; or

(4)

Prohibit the dissemination of public information at a speaking engagement and the incidental use of state resources in the analysis and preparation of that public information if the subject matter of the public information is within the scope of the official duties and responsibilities of the public servant.

(d)(1)

Except as provided under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, a violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

(2)(A)

A public servant who is found guilty or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a violation under this section is ineligible to hold any office, employment, or appointment in a governmental body.

(B)

If a public servant is found guilty or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a violation under this section while employed by a governmental body, he or she shall be removed from employment immediately.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 312, § 2.

7-1-112. Destruction of a ballot or ballot materials — Prohibited — Definitions.

(a)

A person shall not knowingly destroy a ballot or ballot-related material required to be preserved by law until after:

(1)

Two (2) years after the certification of the results of the election; and

(2)

The county board of election commissioners has entered an order, created a record to be maintained, and filed the order for destruction of the ballot or ballot-related material.

(b)(1)

As used in this section, “ballot or ballot-related material” means a ballot or other form that is:

(A)

Provided to a person representing himself or herself as the voter or his or her agent by a county clerk, member of a county board of election commissioners, or poll worker; and

(B)

Returned by the person representing himself or herself as a voter or his or her agent for the purpose of voting in an election.

(2)

“Ballot or ballot-related material” includes without limitation:

(A)

A ballot that has been completed, cast, abandoned, or spoiled;

(B)

A ballot stub or certificate from a ballot that has been completed, cast, abandoned, or spoiled;

(C)

A voter statement that has been submitted to the county clerk;

(D)

An envelope that contains a ballot;

(E)

An affidavit provided to the county clerk;

(F)

An absentee ballot list maintained under §7-5-416;

(G)

An absentee ballot application; and

(H)

A list of applications for an absentee ballot under §7-5-408.

(c)

A person who is convicted under this section is guilty of an unclassified felony and shall:

(1)

Be sentenced to a term of no less than one (1) year and no more than six (6) years; and

(2)

Pay a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1261, § 1.

7-1-113. Vote centers.

(a)(1)

The county board of election commissioners may establish one (1) or more vote centers in the county on election day under §7-5-101.

(2)

A vote center shall be available to any qualified elector registered to vote in the county who applies to the county board of election commissioners while the polls are open on election day.

(b)

If a vote center is used in an election, the vote center shall have a secure electronic connection to provide voting information to and receive voting information from a computerized registration book maintained by the county clerk.

(c)

Before a person is permitted to cast a vote at a vote center, the election official shall:

(1)

Request that the voter identify himself or herself by stating his or her name, date of birth, and address in order to verify his or her registration and provide identification as required by law;

(2)

Request that the voter provide identification as required by law;

(3)

If the voter's name or address is not the same as that in the county voter registration record files, request that the voter complete an updated voter registration application form; and

(4)(A)

Request that the voter sign a voting roster or voting request form that identifies his or her name, address, date of birth, and the date on the roster or form.

(B)

The voting roster or voting request form shall contain the written or printed precinct number or ballot style of the voter.

(d)

If the voter is not listed in the electronic county voter registration files, the election official is unable to verify the voter's registration, and the voter contends that he or she is eligible to vote, the voter shall be directed to his or her polling site for the voter's precinct to cast a ballot.

(e)

The county board of election commissioners shall furnish a vote center location that adequately allows the voter to personally and secretly execute his or her vote.

(f)

The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules for the vote centers that:

(1)

Designate the electronic equipment to be used to verify the registration record of a voter;

(2)

Establish standards for the maintenance and use of the equipment used at a vote center;

(3)

Establish standards for the testing and backup of the equipment used at a vote center;

(4)

Establish standards for a secure electronic connection between a vote center and a county's computerized registration book; and

(5)

Establish procedures for the conduct of the vote center in the event that the electronic system fails.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1389, § 2; 2015, No. 1042, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment deleted “county clerk or” preceding “county board” in (a)(1), (a)(2), and (e); and deleted “county clerk or” preceding “election official” in the introductory language of (c) and in (d).

7-1-114. Display of campaign literature on vehicle of candidate or public official while on State Capitol grounds.

(a)

It is unlawful for a candidate or a public official, as defined in §21-8-402, to display one (1) or more campaign banners, campaign signs, or other campaign literature larger than twelve inches by twelve inches (12" x 12") on a car, truck, tractor, or other vehicle belonging to the candidate or public official while on the State Capitol grounds.

(b)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall promulgate rules concerning the enforcement of this section, including without limitation providing for the imposition of a fine for violations of this section that shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 2.